Massachusetts, session 194th, H4719.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 94 of Chapter 143 of the general laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by inserting in subsection (i) at the end thereof the
following:
; provided however that, in addition to any licenses issued under this section, the board
shall issue a construction supervisor license for heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems
with less than a ten-ton capacity.
HVAC licenses shall be limited to the direct supervision of persons engaged in the
installation, repair, and maintenance of HVAC systems of less than 10-ton capacity.
SECTION 2. Said Section 94, as so appearing, is hereby further amended by striking and
replacing subsection (n) with the following:
of 2

(n) To establish a continuing education advisory council to assist and make
recommendations to the board relative to the formulation, promulgation and administration of
requirements for the continuing education of individuals licensed as construction supervisors.
The council shall consist of: the commissioner of the division of occupational licensure, or his
designee; 2 licensed construction supervisors who shall also be members of the Home Builders
Association of Massachusetts; 2 licensed construction supervisors who shall also be members of
the Air Conditioning Association of New England; 1 licensed construction supervisor who shall
also be a member of the eastern Massachusetts chapter of the National Association of the
Remodeling Industry; and 3 members to be appointed by the commissioner, 2 of whom shall be
certified building inspectors and 1 of whom shall be an instructor in residential construction
technology at a public or private teaching institution. The commissioner shall be chairperson of
the council which shall meet regularly and may establish its own rules for the conduct of its
business. The members of the council shall not be compensated for their services but shall be
reimbursed for travel and other expenses necessary for the performance of their duties. The
board may provide technical and clerical assistance to the council.
SECTION 3. Section 1 shall take effect within 12 months of the passage of this act, as
determined by the board, after the licensing requirements for a construction supervisor license
for heating, ventilation and air conditioning systems with less than a ten-ton capacity have been
established.
of 2